Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 10
PRIVATE FAMILY TRUST COMPANIES

11-109-1001 to 11-109-1007. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part repealed, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1464, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 10 was added in 2008 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2013. For the text of this part 10 prior to 2013, consult the 2012 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.